North Dakota, session 69, HB1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 43 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Board" means a board, commission, or other agency of state government created or
identified in this title to regulate an occupation or profession.
2. "Occupation or profession" means activity for which a license is required from a board
or similar activity for which a foreign license is required in another state or jurisdiction.
Boards - Duties - Licensing complaints - Report .
1. A board shall adopt rules to implement this chapter.
2. A board shall submit a report to the governor annually and in a manner specified by
the governor. Each report must include the following information for the previous
calendar year:
a. A summary of board activity;
b. The number of:
(1) Licensees issued;
(2) License applicants, including the number of;
(a) Total applicants;
(b) In - state and ou t - o f - state applicants; and
Page No. 1 25.0958.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(c) New and renewing applicants; and
(3) Former licensees who failed to renew.
3. A board shall provide instructions on the board's website detailing how to submit a
complaint following an adverse decision of the board or one of its members in matters
relating to licensing.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 54-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Occupational and professional boards - Licensing complaints.
The governor shall develop a procedure through which an individual may submit a
complaint to the office of the governor following an adverse decision of a board or one of its
members relating to a licensing matter for an occupation or profession. The governor shall
establish a procedure to investigate a complaint filed under this section.
Page No. 2 25.0958.01000